Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2320
Nurse practitioner; liability insurance; when required.

(1) Nurse practitioners shall maintain in effect professional liability insurance with such coverage and limits as may be established by the board.

(2) If a nurse practitioner renders services in a hospital or other health care facility, he or she shall be subject to the rules and regulations of that facility. Such rules and regulations may include, but need not be limited to, reasonable requirements that the nurse practitioner and all collaborating licensed practitioners maintain professional liability insurance with such coverage and limits as may be established by the hospital or other health care facility upon the recommendation of the medical staff.

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 35;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 51;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 64;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1723.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 812.